Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. Bribery and Related Offenses.

Collateral references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Bribery, §§ 6-16,
18-21.

11 C.J.S., Bribery, § 1 et seq.

Athletic contests, bribery in, 49 ALR2d 1234.

Solicitation or receipt of funds by public officer or employee for political campaign expenses or similar purposes as bribery, 55 ALR2d 1137.

Entrapment to commit bribery or offer to bribe, 69 ALR2d 1397.

Validity and construction of statutes punishing commercial bribery,
58 ALR Fed. 797.

Criminal liability of corporation for bribery or conspiracy to bribe public official, 52 ALR3d 1274.

Furnishing public official with meals, lodging, or travel, or receipt of such benefits, as bribery, 67 ALR3d 1231.

Criminal offense of bribery as affected by lack of authority of state public officer or employee, 73 ALR3d 374.

Validity of state statute prohibiting award of government contract to person or business entity previously convicted of bribery or attempting to bribe state public employee, 7 ALR4th 1202.

Consummation of offense under 18 USCS § 201(b) of giving, offering, or promising bribe to public official, as affected by fact that latter is not corrupted or refuses to accept bribe, or object of bribe was not attained, 20 ALR Fed. 950.

Sec. 11.56.100.
Bribery.

A person commits the crime of bribery if the person confers, offers to confer, or agrees to confer a benefit upon a public servant with the intent to influence the public servant’s vote, opinion, judgment, action, decision, or exercise of official discretion.

In a prosecution under this section, it is not a defense that the person sought to be influenced was not qualified to act in the desired way, whether because that person had not assumed office, lacked jurisdiction, or for any other reason.

Bribery is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.110.
Receiving a bribe.

A public servant commits the crime of receiving a bribe if the public servant

solicits a benefit with the intent that the public servant’s vote, opinion, judgment, action, decision, or exercise of discretion as a public servant will be influenced; or

accepts or agrees to accept a benefit upon an agreement or understanding that the public servant’s vote, opinion, judgment, action, decision, or exercise of discretion as a public servant will be influenced.

Receiving a bribe is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “benefit” — AS

11.56.130

Definition of “intentionally” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Commercial bribe receiving; commercial bribery — AS

11.46.660

,

11.46.670

Official misconduct — AS

11.56.850

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.120.
Receiving unlawful gratuities.

A public servant commits the crime of receiving unlawful gratuities if, for having engaged in an official act which was required or authorized and for which the public servant was not entitled to any special or additional compensation, the public servant

solicits a benefit, regardless of value; or

accepts or agrees to accept a benefit having a value of $50 or more.

Receiving unlawful gratuities is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant,” “solicits” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “benefit” — AS

11.56.130

Official misconduct — AS

11.56.850

Bribery — AS

11.56.100

Receiving a bribe — AS

11.56.110

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.230.

TD: II, 94.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.124.
Failure to report bribery or receiving a bribe.

A public servant commits the crime of failure to report bribery or receiving a bribe if the public servant

witnesses what the public servant knows or reasonably should know is

bribery of a public servant by another person; or

receiving a bribe by another public servant; and

does not as soon as reasonably practicable report that crime to a peace officer or a law enforcement agency.

Failure to report bribery or receiving a bribe is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 75(a), ch. 47, SLA 2007, this section applies to offenses occurring on or after July 10, 2007.

Sec. 11.56.130.
Definition.

In AS

11.56.100

—

11.56.130

, “benefit” has the meaning ascribed to it in AS

11.81.900

but does not include

political campaign contributions reported in accordance with AS 15.13 unless the contribution is made or received in exchange for an agreement to alter an elected official’s or candidate’s vote or position on a matter the elected official has, or the candidate on election would have, the authority to take official action on; in this paragraph, “official action” means advice, participation, or assistance, including, for example, a recommendation, decision, approval, disapproval, vote, or other similar action, including inaction;

concurrence in official action in the cause of legitimate compromise between public servants; or

support, including a vote, solicited by a public servant or offered by any person in an election.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant,” “solicit” — AS

11.81.900(b)

State election campaigns — AS 15.13

Original Code Provision — None.

For definition of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.56.900

.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 75(a), ch. 47, SLA 2007, the amendment to paragraph (1) of this section made by § 2, ch. 47, SLA 2007 applies to offenses occurring on or after July 10, 2007.